Utah statutes.
53A-11-1401.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Active duty" means full-time duty status in the active uniformed service
of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve on
active duty orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Sections 1209 and 1211.
(2)  "Deployment" means the period one month prior to a service member's
departure from the service member's home station on military orders through
six months after return to the service member's home station.
(3)  "Local education agency" means a public authority legally constituted by
the state as an administrative agency to provide control of and direction for
kindergarten through grade 12 public educational institutions.
(4)  "Military child" means a child enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12
who is legally residing in the household of an active duty service member or
whose parent or legal guardian is an active duty service member.
(5)  "Transitioning" means the time period during which a military child is in
the process of transferring from one school to another.
